Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2652.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 18.71 RCW to read as follows:The commission is authorized to conduct rule making for all licenses issued within its authority under this chapter and chapters 18.71A, 18.71B, 18.71C, and 18.71D RCW to allow for the relinquishment of the license. Relinquishment under these rules must be voluntary. The license cannot be relinquished in lieu of discipline or if the licensee is subject to discipline or under investigation by the commission. The relinquishment is not an adverse action and as such is not reportable to any disciplinary databases, the national practitioner data bank, or other websites. Licensees who request this process agree to the permanent relinquishment of the property right and shall have no right to reinstatement or renewal.--- END ---